Maryland, session 2026, HB0117.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
7–426.8.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “AIRWAY CLEARING DEVICE” MEANS A PORTABLE
MEDICAL DEVICE THAT USES MANUALLY CREATED SUCTION TO REMOVE A
BLOCKAGE FROM THE AIRWAY DURING A CHOKING EMERGENCY.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0117*

HOUSE BILL 117
(B) EACH COUNTY BOARD SHALL ESTABLISH A POLICY FOR PUBLIC
SCHOOLS WITHIN ITS JURISDICTION TO:
(1) OBTAIN AT LEAST ONE AIRWAY CLEARING DEVICE PER SCHOOL;
AND
(2) AUTHORIZE THE SCHOOL NURSE OR OTHER SCHOOL PERSONNEL
TO USE AN AIRWAY CLEARING DEVICE ON AN INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING A CHOKING
EMERGENCY.
(C) THE POLICY ESTABLISHED UNDER SUBSECTION (B) OF THIS SECTION
SHALL INCLUDE REQUIREMENTS FOR:
(1) STORAGE OF AN AIRWAY CLEARING DEVICE IN THE AREAS WHERE
STUDENTS OR SCHOOL PERSONNEL PRIMARILY EAT; AND
(2) TRAINING FOR THE SCHOOL NURSE AND OTHER SCHOOL
PERSONNEL ON:
(I) HOW TO RECOGNIZE THE SYMPTOMS OF AN INDIVIDUAL
EXPERIENCING A CHOKING EMERGENCY; AND
(II) PROCEDURES FOR THE USE OF AN AIRWAY CLEARING
DEVICE ON AN INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING A CHOKING EMERGENCY.
(D) EXCEPT FOR ANY WILLFUL OR GROSSLY NEGLIGENT ACT, A SCHOOL
NURSE OR OTHER SCHOOL PERSONNEL WHO RESPONDS IN GOOD FAITH TO AN
INDIVIDUAL EXPERIENCING A CHOKING EMERGENCY IN ACCORDANCE WITH THIS
SECTION MAY NOT BE HELD PERSONALLY LIABLE FOR ANY ACT OR OMISSION IN THE
COURSE OF RESPONDING TO THE EMERGENCY.
(E) (1) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL DEVELOP AND DISSEMINATE A
STANDARD FORM FOR PUBLIC SCHOOLS TO REPORT EACH INCIDENT REQUIRING
THE USE OF AN AIRWAY CLEARING DEVICE AT THE SCHOOL.
(2) EACH PUBLIC SCHOOL SHALL REPORT TO THE DEPARTMENT, ON
THE FORM THAT THE DEPARTMENT DEVELOPS, EACH INCIDENT AT THE SCHOOL OR
AT A RELATED SCHOOL EVENT THAT REQUIRED THE USE OF AN AIRWAY CLEARING
DEVICE.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.